src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_KELU
	NMN_KELU-SG	;
	NMN_KELU-PL	;
	NMN_KELU-SG/PL	;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-PL ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;


LEXICON NMN_KELU-SG
!! Indefinite
! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Sg
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
! PXSG1-Sg ;
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
 SG-NOM-INDEF-WITHOUT-SUFF ;
+Use/NG: SG-NOM-INDEF-WITH-SUFF ;
:в SG-NOM-INDEF-WITH-SUFF ;
 NMN-SG ;
!! Possessor Indices
+Use/NG: SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
:в SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
+Use/NG:в SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
:в SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
+Use/NG: SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
        NMN_KELU-SG/PL  ;


LEXICON NMN_KELU-PL
!! Indefinite
!+Pl:в PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Pl
!+Pl:в PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
+Pl:в        NMN-PL       ;
        NMN_KELU-SG/PL  ;
+Pl: PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
+Pl: PL-CX-PXSG2 ;
+Pl: PL-CX-PXSG3 ;


LEXICON NMN_KELU-SG/PL
:в SP-GEN-INDEF ;
+Err/Orth: CONSONANT-STEM-4-VAJ ;
:в NOTDEF-CAU ;
:в SP-DAT-INDEF ;
:в SP-LAT-INDEF ;
 SP-DAT-INDEF ;
 NOTDEF-ABL ;
 NOTDEF-ILL ;
 NOTDEF-INE ;
 SP-ELA-INDEF ;
 NOTDEF-ABE ;
 NOTDEF-TRA ;
 NOTDEF-CMPR ;
 NOTDEF-PRL ;
!! Possessor Indices
 PXPL1 ;
 PXPL2 ;
 PXPL3 ;

LEXICON NOM_AG
:й NMN-PL ; !N_ANDY 
 NMN_ANDY-SG/PL  ;
 SG-NOM-INDEF-WITHOUT-SUFF ;
 SG-NOM-INDEF-WITH-SUFF ;!Add some 2023_04_18
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
:й SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
:й SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;


LEXICON NMN_ANDY
	NMN_ANDY-SG	;
	NMN_ANDY-PL	;
	NMN_ANDY-SG/PL	;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-PL ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;


LEXICON NMN_ANDY-SG
!! Indefinite
! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Sg
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
! PXSG1-Sg ;
 SG-NOM-INDEF-WITHOUT-SUFF ;
+Use/NG: SG-NOM-INDEF-WITH-SUFF ;
:й SG-NOM-INDEF-WITH-SUFF ;
! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Sg
: SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!:й SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!! Possessor Indices
+Use/NG: SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
:й SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
+Use/NG:й SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
:й SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
+Use/NG: SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
        NMN_ANDY-SG/PL  ;


LEXICON NMN_ANDY-PL
!! Indefinite
!+Pl:в PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Pl
!+Pl:в PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
:й        NMN-PL       ;
        NMN_ANDY-SG/PL  ;
!озонд%>%{ИЫЙ%}й%>%{Х%}тне

LEXICON NMN_ANDY-SG/PL
:й SP-GEN-INDEF ;
+Use/NG: SP-GEN-INDEF ;
:й NOTDEF-CAU ;
:й SP-DAT-INDEF ; ! Adding 2019-07-20 кельгиенди
 SP-DAT-INDEF ;
 NOTDEF-ABL ;
 SP-ILL-INDEF ;
:й SP-ILL-PX ;
 NOTDEF-ILL ;
 NOTDEF-INE ;
 SP-ELA-INDEF ;
 NOTDEF-ABE ;
  NOTDEF-TRA ;
 NOTDEF-CMPR ;
 NOTDEF-PRL ;
!! Possessor Indices
PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;!20260225
 PL-CX-PXSG2 ;!20260225
 PL-CX-PXSG3 ;!20260225

+Use/NG:й PXPL1 ;
: PXPL1 ;
+Use/NG:й PXPL2 ;
: PXPL2 ;
+Use/NG:й PXPL3 ;
 PXPL3 ;

LEXICON NMN_PEJ
!	NMN_PEJ-SG	;
!	NMN_PEJ-PL	;
!	NMN_PEJ-SG/PL	;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-PL ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
+Err/Orth: CONSONANT-STEM-4-VAJ ;

LEXICON NMN_J-SG
!! Indefinite
SG-NOM-INDEF ;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
+Err/Orth: CONSONANT-STEM-4-VAJ ;

LEXICON NMN_PEJ-SG
!! Indefinite
! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Sg
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
! PXSG1-Sg ;
SG-NOM-INDEF ;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
+Err/Orth: CONSONANT-STEM-4-VAJ ;

LEXICON CONSONANT-STEM-4-VAJ
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CAU@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Cau+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CAU@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>нкса NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Dat+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>нди K/DAT-ARAM ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Gen+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>нь NounEnd_K ;


LEXICON NMN_PEJ-PL
!! Indefinite
! PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Pl
! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
        NMN-PL       ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;

LEXICON NMN_J-PL
!! Indefinite
! PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Pl
! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
        NMN-PL       ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;

LEXICON NMN_KAL
!	NMN_KAL-SG	;
!	NMN_KAL-PL	;
!	NMN_KAL-SG/PL	;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-PL ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;


LEXICON NMN_KAL-SG
!! Indefinite
! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Sg
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
! PXSG1-Sg ;
SG-NOM-INDEF ;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;


LEXICON NMN_KAL-PL
!! Indefinite
! PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Pl
! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
        NMN-PL       ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;


!LEXICON NMN_KAL-SG/PL
! SP-GEN-INDEF ;
! SP-DAT-INDEF ;
! NOTDEF-ABL ;
! NOTDEF-ILL ;
! NOTDEF-INE ;
! SP-ELA-INDEF ;
! NOTDEF-ABE ;
! NOTDEF-TRA ;
! NOTDEF-CMPR ;
! NOTDEF-PRL ;

!! Possessor Indices
! PXSG1-Pl ;
! PXSG2 ;
! PXSG3 ;
! PXPL1 ;
! PXPL2 ;
! PXPL3 ;

!LEXICON NMN_KIAL1
!!	NMN_KIAL1-SG	;
!!	NMN_KIAL1-PL	;
!!	NMN_KIAL1-SG/PL	;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-PL ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
!:%^Ь2ZERO SP-LAT-INDEF ;


LEXICON NMN_KIAL1-SG
!! Indefinite
! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Sg
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
! PXSG1-Sg ;
SG-NOM-INDEF ;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
:%^Ь2ZERO SP-LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON NMN_KIAL1-PL
!! Indefinite
! PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Pl
! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
        NMN-PL       ;
+Err/Orth:%^ЬKEEP        NMN-PL       ;!2025-06-17 older orth вирьхне, вирьхть
        NMN-SG/PL       ;

!LEXICON NMN_PINE
!!	NMN_PINE-SG	;
!!	NMN_PINE-PL	;
!!	NMN_PINE-SG/PL	;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-PL ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
!:%^Ь2ZERO SP-LAT-INDEF ;


LEXICON NMN_PINE-SG
!! Indefinite
! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Sg
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
! PXSG1-Sg ;
SG-NOM-INDEF ;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
:%^Ь2ZERO SP-LAT-INDEF ; !2023_03_09 what does the trigger do

LEXICON NMN_PINE-PL
!! Indefinite
! PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Pl
! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
        NMN-PL       ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;

LEXICON NMN_OSH
!	NMN_KAL-SG	;
!	NMN_KAL-PL	;
!	NMN_KAL-SG/PL	;
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-PL ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_OSH-SG
!!! Indefinite
!! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!!! Definite Sg
!! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!! PXSG1-Sg ;
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
! SP-LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON NMN_OSH-PL
!! Indefinite
! PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Pl
! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
        NMN-PL       ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;

!LEXICON NMN_OSH-SG/PL
! 	NMN_KAL-SG/PL	;

LEXICON NMN_SARAZ
        NMN-SG ;
        NMN-PL ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_SARAZ-SG
!!! Indefinite
!! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!!! Definite Sg
!! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!! PXSG1-Sg ;
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!!!сараз: саразонь
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
! SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_SARAZ-PL
!!! Indefinite
!! PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!!! Definite Pl
!! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!        NMN-PL       ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;

!! MUTUAL NOMINAL
LEXICON NMN_DECLENSION-WITH-ONSET-VOWEL
 PL-NOM-INDEF ;
 SG-NOM-INDEF ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;

 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
 
 SP-CAU ;
 SP-CMPR ;
 SP-DAT-INDEF ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL1 ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL2 ;
 SP-GEN-INDEF ;
 SP-ILL-PX ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;
 SP-PRL_Ova ;
 SP-TRA-INDEF_Oks ;

!LEXICON NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-ALL
! NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-FLOAT ;
!  NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL ;
  

LEXICON NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-FLOAT
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
 SP-TRA-INDEF_ks ;

!LEXICON NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL
!NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-LOSE-STEM-VOWEL ;
!NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-RETAIN-STEM-VOWEL ;

LEXICON NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-LOSE-STEM-VOWEL
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
 PL-NOM-INDEF ;
 SP-ABL ;
 SP-ABE ;
 SP-ELA-INDEF ;
 SP-ILL-INDEF ;
 SP-INE ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL3 ;

 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ; ! has variant 2019-06-21


LEXICON NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-RETAIN-STEM-VOWEL
 SG-NOM-DEF ;
 SP-PRL_Ga ;
 SP-ABL ; !check me 2020-10-28


LEXICON NMN-SG
 SG-NOM-INDEF ;
 NMN-SG-OBL ;
LEXICON NMN-SG-OBL
!! Definite Sg
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!! Possessor Indices
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;

LEXICON NMN-PL
 PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!! Definite Pl
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!! Possessor Indices
! PXSG1-Pl ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;

LEXICON NMN-SG/PL
 NOTDEF-ABE ;
 NOTDEF-ABL ;
 NOTDEF-CAU ;
 NOTDEF-CMPR ;
 SP-DAT-INDEF ;
 SP-GEN-INDEF ;
 NOTDEF-ILL ;
 NOTDEF-INE ;
 SP-ELA-INDEF ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;
 NOTDEF-TRA ;
 NOTDEF-PRL ;
 SP-PRL_Ova ;

!! Possessor Indices
 PXPL1 ;
 PXPL2 ;
 PXPL3 ;

!!!
!LEXICON MUTUAL_NMN-SG
! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!!! Definite Sg
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!!! Possessor Indices
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
! SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;

!LEXICON MUTUAL_NMN-PL
! PL-NOM-INDEF ;
!!! Definite Pl
! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!!! Possessor Indices
!! PXSG1-Pl ;
! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
! PL-CX-PXSG2 ;
! PL-CX-PXSG3 ;

!LEXICON MUTUAL_NMN-SG/PL
! SP-GEN-INDEF ;
! NOTDEF-CAU ;
! SP-DAT-INDEF ;
! NOTDEF-ABL ;
! NOTDEF-ILL ;
! NOTDEF-INE ;
! SP-ELA-INDEF ;
! NOTDEF-ABE ;
! NOTDEF-TRA ;
! NOTDEF-CMPR ;
! NOTDEF-PRL ;
!!! Possessor Indices
! PXPL1 ;
! PXPL2 ;
! PXPL3 ;

!!!


LEXICON SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF
 SG-NOM-DEF ;
 SG-GEN-DEF ;
 SG-DAT-DEF ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-DEF
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Sg+Nom+Def:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>сь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Sg+Nom+Def:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>сь SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Sg+Nom+Def:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>сь SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG-12 ;

LEXICON SG-GEN-DEF
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Sg+Gen+Def:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>ть NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON SG-DAT-DEF
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Sg+Dat+Def:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>ти K/DAT-ARAM ;


LEXICON PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Nom+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>%{Х%}тне NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Cop:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>%{Х%}тне PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Cop:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>%{Х%}тне PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL-12 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Gen+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>%{Х%}тне%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Dat+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@%>%{Х%}тне%>нди K/DAT-ARAM ;


LEXICON SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%>%{ЕОØ%}зе NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%>%{ЕОØ%}зе SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%>%{ЕОØ%}зе SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%>%{ЕОØ%}зе%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Sg+Dat+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%>%{ЕОØ%}зе%>нди K/DAT-ARAM ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Sg+Dat+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%>%{ЕОØ%}з%>ти K/DAT-ARAM ;

!LEXICON PL-CX-PXSG1
! PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
